Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2328
Local permits; treatment; claims against political subdivisions.

The One-Call Notification System Act shall not affect or impair any local ordinances or other provisions of law requiring permits to be obtained before an excavation. A permit issued by a governing body shall not relieve an excavator from complying with the requirements of the act. No claim shall be maintained under the One-Call Notification System Act against a political subdivision or its officers, agents, or employees except to the extent, and only to the extent, provided by the Political Subdivisions Tort Claims Act.

Laws 1994, LB 421, § 28.

Political Subdivisions Tort Claims Act, see section 13-901.